Vermont, session 2025-2026, H341.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Artificial Intelligence Oversight and Safety Standards
§ 4193a. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 2 of 16
(a) Artificial intelligence systems are products that shift decision-making
power and responsibility away from persons to software-based systems, often
without direct human oversight. An artificial intelligence system can be
inherently dangerous due to its capabilities, potential for misuse or
exploitation, and ability to unilaterally evolve.
(b) Developers of sophisticated artificial intelligence systems have an
obligation to make the systems safe when used in reasonably foreseeable ways.
Deployers of these products also have an obligation to ensure that the products
are safe and used in a way that does not materially affect an individual’s rights.
(c) In the artificial intelligence ecosystem, there will typically be multiple
suppliers upstream of a consumer. The original developer of an artificial
intelligence system should be responsible for harms attributable to the artificial
intelligence system, even if the developer is not the deployer of the system to a
consumer. Small businesses using off-the-shelf artificial intelligence products
according to the product’s terms of use are not intended to be covered by this
subchapter.
§ 4193b. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Artificial intelligence agent” is an artificial intelligence system that
is capable of autonomously performing tasks on behalf of a user or another
artificial intelligence system.
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 3 of 16
(2) “Artificial intelligence system” means a machine-based system that
can, for a given set of objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments. Artificial intelligence
systems use machine- and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual
environments, abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an
automated manner, and use model inference to formulate options for
information or action.
(3) “Biometric data” means data that depict or describe physical,
biological, or behavioral traits, characteristics, or measurements of or relating
to an identified or identifiable person’s body. Biometric information includes
depictions, images, descriptions, or recordings of an individual’s facial
features, iris or retina, finger or handprints, voice, genetics, or characteristic
movements or gestures. Biometric information also includes data derived from
the depictions, images, descriptions, or recordings, to the extent that it would
be reasonably possible to identify the person from whose information the data
had been derived.
(4) “Consequential decision” means a decision that either has a legal or
similarly significant effect on an individual’s access to the criminal justice
system, housing, employment, credit, education, health care, or insurance.
(5) “Consumer” means any individual who is a resident of this State.
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 4 of 16
(6) “Deployer” means a person, including a developer, who uses or
operates an artificial intelligence system for internal use or for use by third
parties in the State.
(7) “Developer” means a person who designs, codes, produces, owns, or
substantially modifies an artificial intelligence system for internal use or for
use by a third party in the State.
(8) “Do not train data” means any data whose owner or publisher has
affirmatively asserted that the data should not be used for training an artificial
intelligence system.
(9) “Dual-use foundational model” means an artificial intelligence
system that:
(A) is trained on broad data;
(B) generally uses self-supervision;
(C) contains at least 10 billion parameters;
(D) is applicable across a wide range of contexts; and
(E) exhibits, or could be easily modified to exhibit, high levels of
performance at tasks that pose a serious risk to economic security, public
health or safety, or any combination of those matters, such as by:
(i) substantially lowering the barrier of entry for nonexperts to
design, synthesize, acquire, or use chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear
(CBRN) weapons;
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 5 of 16
(ii) enabling powerful offensive cyber operations through
automated vulnerability discovery and exploitation against a wide range of
potential targets of cyberattacks; or
(iii) permitting the evasion of human control or oversight through
means of deception or obfuscation.
(10) “Generative artificial intelligence system” means an artificial
intelligence system that can generate derived synthetic content, such as text,
images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the
artificial intelligence’s training data. This definition includes an artificial
intelligence agent.
(11) “High-risk artificial intelligence system” means any artificial
intelligence system, regardless of the number of parameters and supervision
structure, that is:
(A) used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used:
(i) as a controlling factor in making a consequential decision;
(ii) to categorize groups of persons by sensitive and protected
characteristics, such as race, ethnic origin, or religious belief;
(iii) in the direct management or operation of critical
infrastructure;
(iv) in vehicles, medical devices, or in the safety system of a
product; or
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 6 of 16
(v) to influence elections or voters; or
(B) used to collect the biometric data of an individual from a
biometric identification system without consent.
(12) “Inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system” means a high-
risk artificial intelligence system, dual-use foundational model, or generative
artificial intelligence system.
(13) “Substantially modifies” or “substantial modification” means a new
version, new release, or other update to an artificial intelligence system or
service that materially changes its functionality or performance, including the
results of retraining or fine tuning.
§ 4193c. OVERSIGHT AND ENFORCEMENT
(a) The Division of Artificial Intelligence within the Agency of Digital
Services shall collect and review Artificial Intelligence System Safety and
Impact Assessments pursuant to this subchapter.
(b) The Attorney General shall enforce the provisions of this subchapter
and may bring an action in the name of the State against a deployer or
developer for noncompliance to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction
the noncompliance. The action may be brought in the Superior Court of the
county in which the person resides, has a place of business, or is doing
business. Said courts are authorized to issue temporary or permanent
injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of this subchapter, the injunctions
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 7 of 16
to be issued without bonds, or to dissolve, or revoke the certificate of authority
of, a deployer or developer.
(c)(1) Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that
any person has engaged in or is engaging in any violation of this subchapter,
the Attorney General may issue a civil investigative demand.
(2) In rendering and furnishing any information requested pursuant to a
civil investigative demand, a developer or deployer may redact or omit any
trade secrets or information protected from disclosure by State or federal law.
If a developer or deployer refuses to disclose or redacts or omits information
based on the exemption from disclosure of trade secrets, the developer or
deployer shall affirmatively state to the Attorney General that the basis for
nondisclosure, redaction, or omission is because the information is a trade
secret.
(3) To the extent that any information requested pursuant to a civil
investigative demand is subject to attorney-client privilege or work-product
protection, disclosure of the information shall not constitute a waiver of the
privilege or protection.
(4) Any information, statement, or documentation provided to the
Attorney General pursuant to this subsection shall be exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act.
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 8 of 16
§ 4193d. WEBSITE AND COMPLAINT MECHANISM
The Attorney General shall post on the Attorney General’s website:
(1) information relating to the responsibilities of a developer, distributor,
and deployer pursuant to section 4193f of this title; and
(2) an online mechanism through which a consumer may submit a
complaint under this subchapter to the Attorney General.
§ 4193e. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM SAFETY AND IMPACT
ASSESSMENT
(a) Each deployer of an inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system
shall:
(1) submit to the Division of Artificial Intelligence an Artificial
Intelligence System Safety and Impact Assessment prior to deploying the
inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system in this State, and every two
years thereafter; and
(2) submit to the Division of Artificial Intelligence an updated Artificial
Intelligence System Safety and Impact Assessment if the deployer makes a
material and substantial change to the inherently dangerous artificial
intelligence system that includes:
(A) the purpose for which the system is used for; or
(B) the type of data the system processes or uses for training
purposes.
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 9 of 16
(b) Each Artificial Intelligence System Safety and Impact Assessment
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall include, with respect to the
inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system:
(1) the purpose of the system;
(2) the deployment context and intended use cases;
(3) the benefits of use;
(4) any foreseeable risk of unintended or unauthorized uses and the steps
taken, to the extent reasonable, to mitigate the risk;
(5) whether the model is proprietary;
(6) a description of the data the system processes or uses for training
purposes;
(7) whether the data the system uses for training purposes has been
processed to remove personal information, copyrighted information, and do not
train data;
(8) a description of transparency measures, including identifying to
individuals when the system is in use;
(9) identification of any third-party artificial intelligence systems or
datasets the deployer relies on to train or operate the system, if applicable;
(10) whether the developer of the system, if different than the deployer,
disclosed the information pursuant to this subsection as well as the results of
testing, vulnerabilities, and the parameters for safe and intended use;
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 10 of 16
(11) a description of the data that the system, once deployed, processes
as inputs;
(12) a description of postdeployment monitoring and user safeguards,
including a description of the oversight process in place to address issues as
issues arise; and
(13) a description of how the model impacts consequential decisions or
the collection of biometric data.
(c) Each deployer of a high-risk artificial intelligence system shall submit a
one-, six-, and 12-month testing result to the Division of Artificial Intelligence
showing the reliability of the results generated by the system, any variance in
those results over the testing periods, and any mitigation strategies for
variances, in the first year of deployment.
(d) Upon the Division of Artificial Intelligence receiving notice that a
deployer of an inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system is not in
compliance with the requirements under this section, the Division shall
immediately notify the deployer of the finding in writing and order the
deployer to submit the assessment required pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section. If the deployer fails to submit the assessment on or before 45 days
after the deployers receives the notice, the Division of Artificial Intelligence
shall notify the Attorney General in writing of the violation.
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 11 of 16
§ 4193f. STANDARD OF CARE
(a) Each developer or deployer of any inherently dangerous artificial
intelligence system that could be reasonably expected to impact consumers
shall exercise reasonable care to avoid any reasonably foreseeable risk arising
out of the development of, intentional and substantial modification to, or
deployment of an artificial intelligence system that causes or is likely to cause:
(1) the commission of a crime or unlawful act;
(2) any unfair or deceptive treatment of or unlawful impact on an
individual;
(3) any physical, financial, relational, or reputational injury on an
individual;
(4) psychological injuries that would be highly offensive to a reasonable
person;
(5) any physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the
private affairs or concerns of a person, if the intrusion would be offensive to a
reasonable person;
(6) any violation to the intellectual property rights of persons under
applicable State and federal laws;
(7) discrimination on the basis of a person’s or class of persons’ actual
or perceived race, color, ethnicity, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, sex
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 12 of 16
characteristics, religion, national origin, familial status, biometric information,
or disability status;
(8) distortion of a person’s behavior in a manner that causes or is likely
to cause that person or another person physical or psychological harm; or
(9) the exploitation of the vulnerabilities of a specific group of persons
due to their age or physical or mental disability in order to materially distort
the behavior of a person pertaining to that group in a manner that causes or is
likely to cause that person or another person physical or psychological harm.
(b) Each developer of an inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system
shall document and disclose to any actual or potential deployer of the artificial
intelligence system any:
(1) reasonably foreseeable risk, including by unintended or unauthorized
uses, that causes or is likely to cause any of the injuries as set forth in
subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) risk mitigation processes that are reasonably foreseeable to mitigate
any injury as set forth in subsection (a) of this section.
§ 4193g. UNSAFE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PRODUCTS;
PROHIBITIONS
(a) No developer shall offer, sell, lease, give, or otherwise place in the
stream of commerce:
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 13 of 16
(1) an inherently dangerous artificial intelligence system, unless the
developer has conducted a documented testing, evaluation, verification, and
validation of that system at least as stringent as the latest version of the
Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Framework published by the National
Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST); or
(2) an artificial intelligence system that creates reasonably foreseeable
risks pursuant to section 4193f of this subchapter, unless the developer
mitigates these risks to the extent possible, considers alternatives, and discloses
vulnerabilities and mitigation tactics to a deployer.
(b) No deployer shall deploy an inherently dangerous artificial intelligence
system or an artificial intelligence system that creates reasonably foreseeable
risks pursuant to section 4193f of this subchapter unless the deployer has
designed and implemented a risk management policy and program for the
model or system. The risk management policy shall specify the principles,
processes, and personnel that the deployer shall use in maintaining the risk
management program to identify, mitigate, and document any risk that is a
reasonably foreseeable consequence of deploying or using the system. Each
risk management policy and program designed, implemented, and maintained
pursuant to this subsection shall be:
(1) at least as stringent as the latest version of the Artificial Intelligence
Risk Management Framework published by the NIST; and
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 14 of 16
(2) reasonable considering:
(A) the size and complexity of the deployer;
(B) the nature and scope of the system, including the intended uses
and unintended uses and the modifications made to the system by the deployer;
and
(C) the data that the system, once deployed, processes as inputs.
§ 4193h. VIOLATIONS; PRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION
(a) A person who violates this subchapter or rules adopted under this
subchapter commits an unfair practice in commerce in violation of section
2453 of this title.
(b) A consumer harmed by a violation of this subchapter or rules adopted
under this subchapter may bring an action in Superior Court for damages
incurred, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of an intentional
violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.
§ 4193i. LIMITATIONS
(a) In any civil action brought against a deployer or developer pursuant to
section 4193h of this subchapter, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that a
developer or deployer upheld the standard of care if the developer or deployer
complied with the provisions of this subchapter.
(b) A deployer who is not also the developer of an inherently dangerous
artificial intelligence system shall not be found in violation of this subchapter
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 15 of 16
if the deployer deploys the system in accordance with the developer’s
instructions and information as set forth in section 4193f of this subchapter.
(c) Nothing in this subchapter shall restrict a developer’s or deployer’s
ability to:
(1) comply with federal, State, or municipal ordinances or regulations;
(2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation,
subpoena, or summons by federal, State, municipal, or other governmental
authorities;
(3) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend legal claims;
(4) provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer;
(5) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including
fulfilling the terms of a written warranty;
(6) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical research in
the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws
and is approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional review board or
by similar independent oversight entities that determine:
(A) that the expected benefits of the research outweigh the risks
associated with the research; and
(B) that the developer or deployer has implemented reasonable
safeguards to mitigate the risks associated with the research; or
VT LEG #379184 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.341
2025 Page 16 of 16
(7) assist another developer or deployer with any of the obligations
imposed under this subchapter.
§ 4193j. APPLICABILITY OF SUBCHAPTER
This subchapter shall apply only to a person that is not a small business as
defined by the U.S. Small Business Administration, and:
(1) conducts business, promotes, or advertises in this State or produces a
product or service consumed by residents of this State; or
(2) engages in the development, distribution, or deployment of a high-
risk artificial intelligence system in this State.
Sec. 2. EFFECT ON CAUSES OF ACTION
Compliance with the provisions of this act shall not:
(1) relieve a person from liability for any causes of action that existed at
common law or by statute prior to the effective date of this act; or
(2) be construed to modify or otherwise affect, preempt, limit, or
displace any causes of action that existed at common law or by statute prior to
the effective date of this act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379184 v.1